District of Columbia statutes.
50-2708

Applicability.

(a)

This chapter shall apply to all vehicles towed by a private tow company under § 50-2702(a) after June 22, 2006.

(b)

This chapter shall also apply to all vehicles towed prior to June 22, 2006; provided, that notice is sent to the owners in accordance with § 50-2702(a) or published in a newspaper of general circulation in accordance with § 50-2702(b).

History

June 22, 2006, D.C. Law 16-139, § 9, 53 DCR 3682